Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Public Utilities Generally
278.280.
Orders by commission as to service — Extension of service.

Whenever the commission, upon its own motion or upon complaint as provided in KRS

278.260

, and after a hearing had upon reasonable notice, finds that the rules, regulations, practices, equipment, appliances, facilities or service of any utility subject to its jurisdiction, or the method of manufacture, distribution, transmission, storage or supply employed by such utility, are unjust, unreasonable, unsafe, improper, inadequate or insufficient, the commission shall determine the just, reasonable, safe, proper, adequate or sufficient rules, regulations, practices, equipment, appliances, facilities, service or methods to be observed, furnished, constructed, enforced or employed, and shall fix the same by its order, rule or regulation.

The commission shall prescribe rules for the performance of any service or the furnishing of any commodity of the character furnished or supplied by the utility, and, on proper demand and tender of rates, the utility shall furnish the commodity or render the service within the time and upon the conditions provided in the rules.

Any person or group of persons may come before the commission and by petition ask that any utility subject to its jurisdiction be compelled to make any reasonable extension. The commission shall hear and determine the reasonableness of the extension, and sustain or deny the petition in whole or in part.

History.

3952-18, 3952-25: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 35, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 32, effective July 15, 1982.

278.285.
Demand-side management plans — Review and approval of proposed plans and mechanisms — Assignment of costs — Home energy assistance programs.

The commission may determine the reasonableness of demand-side management plans proposed by any utility under its jurisdiction. Factors to be considered in this determination include, but are not limited to, the following:

The specific changes in customers’ consumption patterns which a utility is attempting to influence;

The cost and benefit analysis and other justification for specific demand-side management programs and measures included in a utility’s proposed plan;

A utility’s proposal to recover in rates the full costs of demand-side management programs, any net revenues lost due to reduced sales resulting from demand-side management programs, and incentives designed to provide positive financial rewards to a utility to encourage implementation of cost-effective demand-side management programs;

Whether a utility’s proposed demand-side management programs are consistent with its most recent long-range integrated resource plan;

Whether the plan results in any unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage to any class of customers;

The extent to which customer representatives and the Office of the Attorney General have been involved in developing the plan, including program design, cost recovery mechanisms, and financial incentives, and if involved, the amount of support for the plan by each participant, provided however, that unanimity among the participants developing the plan shall not be required for the commission to approve the plan;

The extent to which the plan provides programs which are available, affordable, and useful to all customers; and

Next-generation residential utility meters that can provide residents with amount of current utility usage, its cost, and can be capable of being read by the utility either remotely or from the exterior of the home.

A proposed demand-side management mechanism including:

Recover the full costs of commission-approved demand-side management programs and revenues lost by implementing these programs;

Obtain incentives designed to provide financial rewards to the utility for implementing cost-effective demand-side management programs; or

Both of the actions specified

may be reviewed and approved by the commission as part of a proceeding for approval of new rate schedules initiated pursuant to KRS

278.190

or in a separate proceeding initiated pursuant to this section which shall be limited to a review of demand-side management issues and related rate-recovery issues as set forth in subsection (1) of this section and in this subsection.

The commission shall assign the cost of demand-side management programs only to the class or classes of customers which benefit from the programs. The commission shall allow individual industrial customers with energy intensive processes to implement cost-effective energy efficiency measures in lieu of measures approved as part of the utility’s demand-side management programs if the alternative measures by these customers are not subsidized by other customer classes. Such individual industrial customers shall not be assigned the cost of demand-side management programs.

Home energy assistance programs may be part of a demand-side management program. In considering a home energy assistance program, the commission shall only utilize the criteria set forth in subsections (1)(f) and (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 238, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 11, §
2, effective June 21, 2001; 2008, ch. 139, §
19, effective July 15, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 5, §
18, effective February 25, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(2/25/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 28, provides that the repeal and reenactment of this section in that Act “shall apply retroactively to July 15, 2008.”

278.287.
Voluntary energy cost assistance fund — Customer contributions — Time of and eligibility for disbursements — Biennial reports — Administration costs.

As used in this section:

“Voluntary energy cost assistance fund” means a fund that shall:

Be administered by a utility or provider for the purpose of receiving voluntary contributions from customers and disbursing subsidies to customers;

Be administered in coordination with one (1) or more community action agencies that assist the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in administering federal Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) funding; and

Be maintained in trust and separate from any customer assistance program otherwise implemented by the utility or provider;

“Provider” means any person or persons, excluding an electric power system owned and operated by a municipality, that provide service to retail customers and that own, control, operate, or manage any facility used or to be used for or in connection with any activity described in KRS 278.010(3)(a) or (b) but are not regulated by KRS Chapter 278; and

“Fund” means a voluntary energy cost assistance fund.

Any utility as defined in KRS 278.010(3)(a) or (b) that provides service to retail customers and that does not already administer an energy assistance program prior to July 12, 2006, may establish a fund.

Any provider that does not already administer an energy assistance program prior to July 12, 2006, may establish a fund.

A customer’s voluntary monthly contribution amount to the fund shall be:

An amount equal to the difference of the customer’s monthly bill and the amount of the next highest whole dollar; or

A standard amount not to exceed one dollar ($1).

A customer may make a special contribution to the fund at any time in any amount.

Annual disbursements from the fund may be made in November and December of each year by the utility or provider upon the recommendation of a community action agency for the purpose of providing a utility or provider bill subsidy for residential customers who:

Use electricity or natural or manufactured gas as a principal source of home energy;

Are responsible for their home heating costs either directly or indirectly as an undesignated portion of the rent;

Have a total household income that is at or below the percentage of the federal poverty guidelines required for eligibility in the subsidy component of LIHEAP, as specified in the latest federally approved version of the Kentucky LIHEAP State Plan submitted by the Department for Community Based Services;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) if those liquid monetary resources are not used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) if those liquid monetary resources are used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness; and

Are customers of the utility or provider.

If available, additional disbursements from the fund may be made from January 1 through March 15 of each year by the utility or provider upon the recommendation of a community action agency for the purpose of providing a utility or provider bill subsidy for residential customers who:

Use electricity or natural or manufactured gas as a principal source of home energy;

Are responsible for their home heating costs either directly or indirectly as an undesignated portion of the rent;

Have a total household income that is at or below the percentage of the federal poverty guidelines required for eligibility in the subsidy component of LIHEAP, as specified in the latest federally approved version of the Kentucky LIHEAP State Plan submitted by the Department for Community Based Services;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) if those liquid monetary resources are not used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) if those liquid monetary resources are used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness; and

Are utility or provider customers who:

Have received a disconnect notice from the utility or provider;

Are within four (4) days of running out of fuel oil, propane, kerosene, wood, or coal; or

Have received an eviction notice for nonpayment of rent, when heat is included as an undesignated portion of the rent.

If available, additional summer cooling disbursements from the fund may be made on a one (1) time basis from May through August of each year by the utility or provider upon the recommendation of a community action agency for the purpose of providing an air-conditioning unit to residential customers who:

Are responsible for their home heating costs either directly or indirectly as an undesignated portion of the rent;

Have a total household income that is at or below the percentage of the federal poverty guidelines required for eligibility in the subsidy component of LIHEAP, as specified in the latest federally approved version of the Kentucky LIHEAP State Plan submitted by the Department for Community Based Services;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) if those liquid monetary resources are not used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness;

Have liquid monetary resources that do not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) if those liquid monetary resources are used for the medical and living expenses of a household member with a catastrophic illness;

Are customers of the utility or provider;

Do not have access to an air conditioner; and

Have a household member who:

Has a health condition or disability that requires cooling to prevent further deterioration as verified by a physician’s statement;

Is sixty-five (65) years of age or older; or

Is under the age of six (6).

For the six (6) month period from January 1 to June 30 of each year, each utility or provider that administers a fund shall provide a detailed report of costs in administering the fund and a detailed report of receipts to and disbursements from the fund to the commission no later than July 31, and for the six (6) month period from July 1 to December 31, no later than January 31 of the following year. Any balances remaining in the fund at the end of a year shall remain in the fund for use in succeeding years.

The commission shall require all utilities as defined in KRS 278.010(3)(a) and (b) that administer a fund and provide service to retail customers in Kentucky to develop and implement a mechanism for soliciting and receiving contributions to the fund. The mechanism and format shall be approved by the commission and may include but shall not be limited to a check-the-box format. Contributions shall be made as described in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

Any provider that administers a fund shall comply with the requirements to implement a mechanism for soliciting and receiving contributions to the fund as provided in subsection (10) of this section.

Those utilities and providers that are already administering an energy assistance program prior to July 12, 2006, shall not be subject to subsections (9), (10), and (11) of this section.

All contributions to the fund shall be voluntary and shall be uniformly assessed monthly, except in the case of a special contribution, which can be made in any amount at any time, for all customers of the utility or provider. A customer shall not be subject to making contributions until such time as his or her intent is submitted to the applicable utility in a manner prescribed by the commission. A customer who no longer wishes to contribute to the fund shall be exempted from making further contributions to the fund once his or her intent is submitted to the applicable utility in a manner prescribed by the commission.

Contributions received by utilities or providers, together with any interest accruing thereon, shall be transferred to the fund immediately upon receipt.

A utility or provider that administers a fund may recover up to three percent (3%) of each contribution received for its costs in administering the fund. The commission shall allow any additional, reasonable cost a utility incurs in administering the receipt and disbursement of contributions to the fund in the cost of service of the utility for ratemaking purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 91, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

278.290.
Valuation of utility property in connection with rates, service or issuance of securities — Unit rate base.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the commission may ascertain and fix the value of the whole or any part of the property of any utility in so far as the value is material to the exercise of the jurisdiction of the commission, and may make revaluations from time to time and ascertain the value of all new construction, extensions and additions to the property of the utility. In fixing the value of any property under this subsection, the commission shall give due consideration to the history and development of the utility and its property, original cost, cost of reproduction as a going concern, capital structure, and other elements of value recognized by the law of the land for rate-making purposes.

The commission shall not value or revalue the property of any utility unless the valuation or revaluation is necessary or advisable in order to determine the legality or reasonableness of any rate or service or of the issuance of securities, and then only after an investigation affecting the rate, service or securities has been instituted by the commission upon complaint or application or upon its own motion, and a hearing has been held on reasonable notice.

In any rate investigation where the utility serves two (2) or more municipalities, the commission may, in computing the rate of return on the property used and useful, take as the base for the computation the valuation of the system as a whole, but may make a differential in the case of an individual municipality in proportion to the increased cost of service, if the utility can show that such a differential should be allowed.

History.

3952-17, 3952-19: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 46, § 3; 1978, ch. 379, § 36, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 33, effective July 15, 1982.

278.295.
Determination of value of acquired water and sewer system assets for ratemaking purposes.

As used in this section:

“Accumulated depreciation” means the total amount of depreciation of an asset as calculated by the use of generally accepted accounting principles;

“Asset acquisition price” means full and actual costs of a water or sewer utility or its assets;

“Net original cost” means the original cost of a utility asset less its accumulated depreciation; and

“Water or sewer system” means any or all assets of a person, including but not limited to a utility, city, sanitation district, metropolitan sewer district, water commission, or regional wastewater commission, that are used to provide services listed in KRS 278.010(3)(d) or (f).

In furtherance of and consistent with the General Assembly’s findings and goals stated in KRS 224A.300(1), in any matter in which the commission determines for ratemaking purposes the value of an asset used to provide water or sewer service acquired by a utility from a water or sewer system, the commission shall fix the value of that asset at an amount between its net original cost and its asset acquisition price without regard for the original source of funds used to procure the asset, but only if the acquiring utility demonstrates and the commission finds that:

The asset acquisition price was established by arms-length negotiations;

The asset acquisition price plus the cost of restoring the acquired facilities to required standards will not materially adversely impact the overall costs or rates of the acquiring utility’s existing and new customers;

Acquisition of the asset will result in operational economies;

The purchase prices of the utility and non-utility assets are clearly identified, and where practical, separated; and

The acquisition will result in overall financial and service benefits of the acquiring utility’s operations.

A utility that has entered into an agreement to acquire the assets of a water or sewer system used to provide water or sewer service may apply to the commission for an order declaring the value of the acquired assets for ratemaking purposes. The application shall include:

The agreement for the acquisition of the assets or facilities at issue;

The proposed valuation for ratemaking purposes of the acquired assets;

The net original cost of the acquired assets and the accounting records supporting such cost to the extent such information is available;

The original source of funds used to procure each asset to the extent such information is available; and

Any other documents or evidence that the commission may require.

An application made under this subsection shall be made under oath and shall be signed and filed on behalf of the acquiring utility by its president or other executive officer duly designated by the utility as having knowledge of the matters set forth therein. The commission shall issue a decision on the merits of an application filed under this subsection no later than sixty (60) days after the application is accepted for filing, unless the commission extends this period, for good cause, to one hundred fifty (150) days from the date of acceptance. The commission may take any action necessary to ensure a complete record, including conducting a hearing on the application.

In lieu of applying for a declaratory order under subsection (3) of this section on the valuation of assets acquired from a water or sewer system used to provide water or sewer service, an acquiring utility may, as part of its first application for a change in base rates following the acquisition of such assets, seek an order declaring the value of the acquired assets for ratemaking purposes. The commission shall declare the value of the acquired assets using the same factors required to be considered under subsection (2) of this section.

No later than the date of the filing of the application described in subsection (3) of this section, the acquiring utility shall provide notice of the application to the following:

By certified mail, the local governing body of each city or county wherein any part of the water or sewer system to be acquired is located or provides retail water or sewer service;

By certified mail, the local governing body of each city or county in whose jurisdiction the acquiring utility provides retail water or sewer service;

The customers of the water or sewer system being acquired, as provided in the bylaws or other governing corporate documents of the system being acquired, and using the method of notice so required; and

The wholesale customers or suppliers of the water or sewer system to be acquired by causing the notice to be placed in priority mail.

No later than the date of the filing of the application described in subsection (3) of this section, additional notification designed to educate and inform the public and all affected customers shall be posted on the Web sites or social media of the acquiring entity and of the water or sewer system to be acquired, if such Web sites or social media exist.

The commission shall consider intervention requests made by any person in any matter under this section in accordance with the commission’s administrative regulations addressing intervention generally.

The acquiring utility may, as part of any application for a change in base rates following the acquisition of water or sewer utility service assets, propose to unify the rate structure of the acquired system with its remaining customer base. In reviewing an acquiring utility’s proposed change in base rates, the commission shall consider whether it is reasonable to require the acquiring utility to maintain separate rate schedules for the customers of the acquired system and for the other customers.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 191, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

278.300.
Issuance or assumption of securities by utilities.

No utility shall issue any securities or evidences of indebtedness, or assume any obligation or liability in respect to the securities or evidences of indebtedness of any other person until it has been authorized so to do by order of the commission.

Application for authority to issue or assume securities or evidences of indebtedness shall be made in such form as the commission prescribes. Every such application shall be made under oath, and shall be signed and filed on behalf of the utility by its president, or by a vice president, auditor, comptroller, or other executive officer having knowledge of the matters set forth and duly designated by the utility. Every such application shall be placed at the head of the docket of the commission and disposed of promptly within sixty (60) days after it is filed with the commission, unless it is necessary for good cause to continue the application for longer time than sixty (60) days, in which case the order making the continuance shall state fully the facts that make it necessary.

The commission shall not approve any issue or assumption unless, after investigation of the purposes and uses of the proposed issue and the proceeds thereof, or of the proposed assumption of obligation or liability, the commission finds that the issue or assumption is for some lawful object within the corporate purposes of the utility, is necessary or appropriate for or consistent with the proper performance by the utility of its service to the public and will not impair its ability to perform that service, and is reasonably necessary and appropriate for such purpose.

The commission may grant or deny the application in whole or in part, or may grant it with such modifications and upon such terms and conditions as the commission deems necessary or appropriate. The order of the commission shall specify that the securities or evidences of indebtedness, or the proceeds thereof, shall be used only for the lawful purposes specified in the application, and both the application of the utility and the order of the commission shall state in general terms the purpose of the issuance or assumption.

A copy of any order made and entered by the commission under this section, duly certified by the executive director of the commission, shall be sufficient evidence for all purposes of full and complete compliance by the utility with all procedural and other matters required precedent to the entry of the order.

Securities and evidences of indebtedness issued and obligations and liabilities assumed by a utility, for which, under the provisions of this section, the authorization of the commission is required, shall comply with the terms and conditions of the order of authorization entered prior to the issue or assumption, and where the order has been fully complied with the validity of the issue or assumption shall not be affected by a failure to comply with any provision of this section or rule of the commission relating to procedure or other matters preceding the entry of the order of authorization or order supplemental thereto.

The commission may require periodical or special reports from the utility issuing any security or evidence of indebtedness. The report shall show, in such detail as the commission requires, the disposition made of such securities or evidences of indebtedness, and the application of the proceeds thereof.

This section does not apply to notes issued by a utility, for proper purposes and not in violation of law, that are payable at periods of not more than two (2) years from the date thereof, or to like notes, payable at a period of not more than two (2) years from date thereof, that are issued to pay or refund in whole or in part any such notes, or to renewals of such notes from time to time, not exceeding in the aggregate six (6) years from the date of the issue of the original notes so renewed or refunded.

Nothing in this section implies any guarantee of securities or evidences of indebtedness by the state, or any obligation on the part of the state with respect thereto, and nothing in this section limits the power of any court having jurisdiction to authorize or cause receiver’s certificates or debentures to be issued according to the rules and practice obtaining in receivership proceedings in courts of equity.

This section does not apply in any instance where the issuance of securities or evidences of indebtedness is subject to the supervision or control of the federal government or any agency thereof, but the commission may appear as a party to any proceeding filed or pending before any federal agency if the issuance of the securities or evidences of indebtedness will materially affect any utility over which the commission has jurisdiction.

This section also does not apply to the issuance of securities or evidence of indebtedness by a utility principally engaged in transportation of gas by pipeline in interstate commerce and subject to the supervision, control or jurisdiction of the federal government or any agency, board or commission thereof.

History.

3952-24: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 9; 1978, ch. 379, § 37, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 34, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 166, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

278.310.
Rules for hearings and investigations.

All hearings and investigations before the commission or any commissioner shall be governed by rules adopted by the commission, and in the conduct thereof neither the commission nor the commissioner shall be bound by the technical rules of legal evidence.

History.

3952-34: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 38, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 35, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 242, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1982 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

278.320.
Process.

The commission and each of the commissioners may issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and all necessary process in proceedings brought before or initiated by the commission, and such process shall extend to all parts of the state. Service of process in all proceedings brought before or initiated by the commission may be made by certified mail, return receipt requested or by registered mail, or in the same manner as other process in civil cases, as the commission directs.

History.

3952-37: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 315, § 43; 1978, ch. 379, § 39, effective April 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 114, § 65, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 82, § 36, effective July 15, 1982.

278.330.
Witnesses.

The commission and each of the commissioners, for the purposes mentioned in the preceding sections of this chapter, may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and certify official acts. If any person fails to comply with any lawful order of the commission or of any commissioner, or with process, or if any witness refuses to testify concerning any matter on which he may lawfully be interrogated, any Circuit Judge, on application of the commission or of a commissioner, may compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued from the circuit court or a refusal to testify therein. Witnesses summoned before the commission, and witnesses whose depositions are taken pursuant to the provisions of the preceding sections of this chapter, and the officer taking the depositions, shall be entitled to the same fees as are paid for like services in circuit courts, the fees to be paid by the party in whose behalf the witness is subpoenaed.

History.

3952-38: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 40, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 37, effective July 15, 1982.

278.340.
Depositions.

The commission itself may take depositions, or grant deposition rights at its discretion to any party in a proceeding before the commission. Depositions in commission proceedings shall be taken in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

3952-39: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 41, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

278.350.
Incriminating evidence — Immunity of witnesses.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any book, paper or account at any inquiry by, or hearing before, the commission or any commissioner, upon the ground that the testimony or the book, paper or account required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to penalty or forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or subjected to any forfeiture or penalty for, or on account of, anything concerning which he was compelled to testify under oath or to produce documentary evidence, except that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for perjury committed by him in his testimony.

History.

3952-40: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 42, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 39, effective July 15, 1982.

278.360.
Record of contested proceedings on formal hearing.

A full and complete record shall be kept of all contested proceedings had before the commission or any commissioner on any formal hearing and may, at the commission’s discretion, be made in videotape or other format in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. A stenographic transcript shall not be required. However, a party to a proceeding may, by motion to the commission made prior to the hearing, request that a stenographic transcript be made by a reporter approved by the commission. The commission shall not deny the motion except for a finding of good cause.

History.

3952-43: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 43, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 40, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 83, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

278.370.
Recording of order, finding, authorization or certificate — How proved to be in effect.

Every order, finding, authorization or certificate issued or approved by the commission under any of the preceding provisions of this chapter shall be in writing and shall be entered on the records of the commission. A certificate under the seal of the commission that any such order, finding, authorization or certificate has not been modified, stayed, suspended or revoked shall be received as evidence in any proceeding as to the facts stated therein.

History.

3952-42: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 44, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 41, effective July 15, 1982.

278.380.
Delivery of orders by electronic transmission or mail.

The commission shall deliver a certified copy of any order issued by it to each party to the proceeding in which the order was made, and to an officer or agent of the utility affected thereby. Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the commission may deliver its orders by means of electronic transmission rather than by mail. The commission, however, shall deliver its orders by mail to any party that requests and demonstrates good cause for that means of delivery. When service of a commission order is by electronic transmission, mailing shall be deemed to have occurred on the date the transmission of the order is completed. For purposes of this section, electronic transmission of a commission order includes the sending of an electronic mail message that contains an electronic version of the commission order or a hyperlink that enables the recipient to access, view, and download an electronic copy of the commission order from the commission’s Web site.

History.

3952-35: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 45, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 42, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 120, § 32, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

278.390.
Enforcement of orders.

The commission may compel obedience to its lawful orders by mandamus, injunction or other proper proceedings in the Franklin Circuit Court or any other court of competent jurisdiction, and such proceedings shall have priority over all pending cases. Every order entered by the commission shall continue in force until the expiration of the time, if any, named by the commission in the order, or until revoked or modified by the commission, unless the order is suspended, or vacated in whole or in part, by order or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

3952-13: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 46, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 43, effective July 15, 1982.

278.400.
Rehearing.

After a determination has been made by the commission in any hearing, any party to the proceedings may, within twenty (20) days after the service of the order, apply for a hearing with respect to any of the matters determined. Service of a commission order is complete three (3) days after the date the order is mailed. The application shall specify the matters on which a rehearing is sought. The commission shall either grant or deny the application for rehearing within twenty (20) days after it is filed, and failure of the commission to act upon the application within that period shall be deemed a denial of the application. Notice of the hearing shall be given in the same manner as notice of an original hearing. Upon the rehearing any party may offer additional evidence that could not with reasonable diligence have been offered on the former hearing. Upon the rehearing, the commission may change, modify, vacate or affirm its former orders, and make and enter such order as it deems necessary.

History.

3952-36: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 47, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 44, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

278.410.
Action to review order of commission — Institution — Answer — Injunction.

Any party to a commission proceeding or any utility affected by an order of the commission may, within thirty (30) days after service of the order, or within twenty (20) days after its application for rehearing has been denied by failure of the commission to act, or within twenty (20) days after service of the final order on rehearing, when a rehearing has been granted, bring an action against the commission in the Franklin Circuit Court to vacate or set aside the order or determination on the ground that it is unlawful or unreasonable. Service of a commission order is complete three (3) days after the date the order is mailed. Notice of the institution of such action shall be given to all parties of record before the commission.

The answer of the commission shall be served and filed within twenty (20) days after service of the complaint. The action shall then be at issue and stand ready for trial upon ten (10) days’ notice to either party, on the equity side of the docket of the court. The answer need not deny verbatim the allegations of the petition, but a general denial thereof on behalf of the commission shall be sufficient.

Injunctive relief may be granted by the Circuit Court in the manner and upon the terms provided by law.

History.

3952-44, 3952-45, 3952-46: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 46, § 4; 1976, ch. 88, § 13, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 48, effective April 1, 1979; 1994, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

278.420.
Designation and filing of record — Cost.

In any action filed against the commission because of its order in a proceeding before it, the commission shall file a certified copy of the designated record and evidence with the court in which the action is pending.

Unless an agreed statement of the record is filed with the court, the filing party shall designate, within ten (10) days after an action is filed, the portions of the record necessary to determine the issues raised in the action. Within ten (10) days after the service of the designation or within ten (10) days after the court enters an order permitting any other party to intervene in the action, whichever occurs last, any other party to the action may designate additional portions for filing. The court may enlarge the ten (10) day period where cause is shown. Additionally, the court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

The cost of preparing and certifying the record shall be taxed and paid to the commission as directed by the court upon final determination of the action. As a part of this determination, the court may tax a party for the cost of preparing portions of the record not deemed reasonably necessary to the disposition of the action. Copies of the designated record shall be furnished at cost to any party to the action.

History.

3952-48: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 49, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 45, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 354, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90). This section was amended by identical amendments in two 1990 Acts, which have been compiled together.

278.430.
Burden of proof.

In all trials, actions or proceedings arising under the preceding provisions of this chapter or growing out of the commission’s exercise of the authority or powers granted to it, the party seeking to set aside any determination, requirement, direction or order of the commission shall have the burden of proof to show by clear and satisfactory evidence that the determination, requirement, direction or order is unreasonable or unlawful.

History.

3952-49: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 50, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 46, effective July 15, 1982.